Utah statutes.
17D-1-104.   Property owner provisions -- Determination of registered
voters.
(1)  For purposes of this chapter:
(a)  the owner of real property is:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(a)(ii), the fee title owner
according to the records of the county recorder on the date of the filing of
the petition or protest; or
(ii)  for a proposed annexation or addition of a new service under Part 4,
Annexing a New Area and Adding a New Service, the lessee of military land, as
defined in Section 63H-1-102, if the area proposed to be annexed or within
which a new service is proposed to be added includes military land that is
within a project area described in a project area plan adopted by the military
installation development authority under Title 63H, Chapter 1, Military
Installation Development Authority Act; and
(b)  the value of private real property is determined according to the last
assessment before the filing of the petition or protest, as determined by:
(i) (A)  the county under Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 3, County Assessment, for
property subject to assessment by the county; or
(B)  the State Tax Commission under Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 2, Assessment of
Property, for property subject to assessment by the State Tax Commission; and
(ii)  the county, for all other property.
(2)  For purposes of each provision of this chapter that requires the owners
of private real property covering a percentage of the total private land area
within the applicable area to sign a petition or protest:
(a)  a parcel of real property may not be included in the calculation of the
required percentage unless the petition or protest is signed by:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), owners representing a
majority ownership interest in that parcel; or
(ii)  if the parcel is owned by joint tenants or tenants by the entirety, 50%
of the number of owners of that parcel;
(b)  the signature of a person signing a petition or protest in a
representative capacity on behalf of an owner is invalid unless:
(i)  the person's representative capacity and the name of the owner the person
represents are indicated on the petition or protest with the person's
signature; and
(ii)  the person provides documentation accompanying the petition or protest
that reasonably substantiates the person's representative capacity; and
(c)  subject to Subsection (2)(b), a duly appointed personal representative
may sign a petition or protest on behalf of a deceased owner.
(3)  For purposes of this chapter, registered voters shall be determined
according to the official register.
